test/src/morphology/case-endings_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst

Tests:
  Standard nouns ending in -a:
    # Singular
    cirya+N+Sing+Nom: cirya
    cirya+N+Sing+Acc: cirya
    cirya+N+Sing+Gen: ciryo
    cirya+N+Sing+Ins: ciryanen
    cirya+N+Sing+All: ciryanna
    cirya+N+Sing+Dat: ciryan
    cirya+N+Sing+Loc: ciryasse
    cirya+N+Sing+Loc+Short: ciryas
    cirya+N+Sing+Abl: ciryallo
    cirya+N+Sing+Poss: cirya{w}a
    # Dual
    cirya+N+Dual+Nom: ciryat
    cirya+N+Dual+Acc: ciryat
    cirya+N+Dual+Gen: ciryato
    cirya+N+Dual+Ins: ciryanten
    cirya+N+Dual+All: ciryanta
    cirya+N+Dual+Dat: ciryant
    cirya+N+Dual+Loc: ciryatse
    # cirya+N+Dual+Loc+Short: ciryates ???
    cirya+N+Dual+Abl: ciryalto
    cirya+N+Dual+Poss: ciryat{w}a
    # Plural
    cirya+N+Plur+Nom: ciryar
    cirya+N+Plur+Acc: ciryar
    cirya+N+Plur+Gen: ciryron
    cirya+N+Plur+Ins: ciryainen
    cirya+N+Plur+All: ciryannar
    cirya+N+Plur+Dat: ciryain
    cirya+N+Plur+Loc: ciryassen
    cirya+N+Plur+Loc+Short: ciryais
    cirya+N+Plur+Abl: ciryallon
    cirya+N+Plur+Poss: ciryai{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Nom: ciryali
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Acc: ciryali
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Gen: cirylion
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Ins: ciryalínen
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+All: [ciryalinnar, ciryalinna]
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Dat: ciryalin
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [ciryalissen, ciryalisse]
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: ciryalis
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [ciryalillon, ciryalillo]
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Poss: ciryalí{w}a
